District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.17

Payment of federal income taxes.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 409, ch. 93, title 5, § 17
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1417.
1973 Ed., § 35-1117.